Georgia statutes. TITLE 46 Public Utilities and Public Transportation
CHAPTER 8A Rapid Rail Passenger Service

Cross references.

Jurisdiction of Public Service Commission over rapid rail passenger service, §

46-2-20

.

46-8A-1.
“Person” defined.

As used in this chapter, the term “person” means any corporation, company, firm, association, or individual operating a public rapid rail passenger service line in this state, provided that said term shall not include any public corporation or governmental entity.

History.

Code 1981, §

46-8A-1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 856, § 4.

46-8A-2.
Line or system permit required.

Except as provided in Code Section 46-8A-4, no person shall operate any rapid rail passenger service line or system or any extension thereof in this state without first obtaining a permit from the Public Service Commission.
The commission shall grant a permit to any person who complies with the guidelines and standards established by the commission.

History.

Code 1981, §

46-8A-2

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 856, § 4.

46-8A-3.
Permit application process.

The application for any permit provided for in Code Section 46-8A-2 shall be made under such rules and regulations as the commission may from time to time prescribe. Upon the receipt of any such application for such permit, the commission shall cause notice thereof to be given by mail or by personal service to the chief executive officer of the municipalities affected, if any, and shall publish such notice once a week for three consecutive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation in each county affected.

History.

Code 1981, §

46-8A-3

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 856, § 4.

46-8A-4.
Permit for extension of line or system.

This Code section shall not be construed to require any person to secure a permit for an extension of a rapid rail passenger service line or system into territory contiguous to that already served by that person and not receiving similar service from another person if no permit has been issued to or applied for by any other person.

History.

Code 1981, §

46-8A-4

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 856, § 4.